Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 6 Peer Review Groups

Law reviews.

For note on 1995 amendments of Code sections in this article, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 258 (1995).

31-7-130.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide protection for those individuals who are members of peer review groups which evaluate the quality and efficiency of professional health care providers and to protect the confidentiality of their records.

History.

Code 1933, § 84-7601, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1282, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Shield Remains: An Overview of the Georgia Peer Review Privilege,” see 11 Ga. St. B. J. 16 (2005).

31-7-131.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Peer review” means the procedure by which professional health care providers evaluate the quality and efficiency of services ordered or performed by other professional health care providers, including practice analysis, inpatient hospital and extended care facility utilization review, medical audit, ambulatory care review, claims review, underwriting assistance, and the compliance of a hospital, nursing home, convalescent home, or other health care facility operated by a professional health care provider with the standards set by an association of health care providers and with applicable laws, rules, and regulations.

“Professional health care provider” means an individual who is licensed, or an organization which is approved, to practice or operate in the health care field under the laws of Georgia, including, but not limited to, the following individuals or organizations:

A physician;

A dentist;

A podiatrist;

A chiropractor;

An optometrist;

A psychologist;

A pharmacist;

A registered or practical nurse;

A physical therapist;

An administrator of a hospital, a nursing or convalescent home, or other health care facility;

A corporation or other organization operating a hospital, a nursing or convalescent home, or other health care facility, as well as the officers, directors, or employees of such corporation or organization or the members of such corporation’s or organization’s governing board who are performing a peer review function;

A rehabilitation supplier registered with the State Board of Workers’ Compensation; and

An occupational therapist.

“Review organization” means a nationally recognized health care accreditation body or any panel, committee, or organization:

Which:

Is primarily composed of professional health care providers;

Is an insurer, self-insurer, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, provider network, or other organization engaged in managed care; or

Provides professional liability insurance for health care providers; and

Which engages in or utilizes peer reviews and gathers and reviews information relating to the care and treatment of patients for the purposes of:

Evaluating and improving the quality and efficiency of health care rendered;

Reducing morbidity or mortality;

Evaluating claims against health care providers or engaging in underwriting decisions in connection with professional liability insurance coverage for health care providers;

Compiling aggregate data concerning the procedures and outcomes of hospitals for the purposes of evaluating the quality and efficiency of health care services. Under no circumstances shall any such aggregate data or any other peer review information relating to an individual professional health care provider be disclosed or released to any person or entity without the express prior written consent of such health care provider, but such aggregate data or other peer review information may be released to another review organization upon the written request of such organization if such requesting review organization has specific reason to believe that immediate access to such aggregate data or information is necessary to protect the public health, safety, and welfare. Such aggregate data and other peer review information shall be used for peer review purposes only and in no event shall such aggregate data or any other peer review information be sold or otherwise similarly distributed, but a review organization shall be authorized to utilize the services of and pay a fee to another person or entity to compile or analyze such aggregate data;

Evaluating the quality and efficiency of health care services rendered by a professional health care provider in connection with such provider’s participation as or request to participate as a provider in or for an insurer, self-insurer, health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, provider network, or other organization engaged in managed care; or

Performing any of the functions or activities described in Code Section 31-7-15.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 739, § 1; Code 1933, § 84-7602, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1282, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 699, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1987, p. 656, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1016, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 612, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 192, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 337, § 3/SB 361.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “; and” was substituted for “, and” at the end of division (3)(A)(iii).

31-7-132.
Immunity from liability for peer review activities; immunity from liability of persons providing information.

No professional health care provider nor any individual who serves as a member or employee of a professional health care provider or review organization nor any individual who furnishes counsel or services to a professional health care provider or review organization shall be held, by reason of the performance of peer review activities, to have violated any criminal law or to be civilly liable under any law unless he was motivated by malice toward any person affected by such activity.

No person, whether as a witness or otherwise, who provides information regarding peer review to a professional health care provider or review organization shall be held, by reason of having provided such information, to have violated any criminal law or to be civilly liable under any law unless such information is false and the person providing it knew that such information was false.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 739, §§ 2, 3; Code 1933, § 84-7603, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1282, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1494, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 612, § 3.

Cross references.

Immunity of medical review committee members from civil liability, §

31-7-140

et seq.

Nonliability of licensed dentist serving on peer review board for damages for any action taken by such board, §

43-11-16

.

Receipt of evidence before Georgia Composite Medical Board regarding licensee’s or applicant’s fitness to practice medicine, §

43-34-8

.

31-7-133.
Confidentiality of review organization’s records.

Except in proceedings alleging violation of this article, the proceedings and records of a review organization shall be held in confidence and shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action; and no person who was in attendance at a meeting of such organization shall be permitted or required to testify in any such civil action as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the proceedings or activities of such organization or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of such organization or any members thereof. The confidentiality provisions of this article shall also apply to any proceedings, records, actions, activities, evidence, findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, data, or other information shared between review organizations which are performing a peer review function or disclosed to a governmental agency as required by law. However, information, documents, or records otherwise available from original sources are not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any such civil action merely because they were presented during proceedings of such organization, nor should any person who testifies before such organization or who is a member of such organization be prevented from testifying as to matters within such person’s knowledge; but such witness cannot be asked about such witness’s testimony before such organization or about opinions formed by such witness as a result of the organization hearings. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Department of Community Health may inspect and copy peer review materials maintained by certain providers when it is determined by the department to be necessary in the performance of the department’s licensure and certification responsibilities under Code Section 31-7-15; provided, however, such inspection and copying shall not waive or abrogate the confidentiality of such peer review materials as set forth in this Code section and in Code Section 31-7-15.

This Code section shall not apply to prevent:

The disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 of those documents in the department’s custody which are records, reports, or recommendations of a nationally recognized health care accreditation body and which are provided by an institution to the department for licensure purposes under subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-3;

The use of peer review documents in any proceeding involving the permitting or licensing of an institution pursuant to this chapter to the extent necessary to challenge the effectiveness of the institution’s peer review system; provided, however, such use shall not waive or abrogate the confidentiality of such documents as set forth in this Code section and in Code Section 31-7-15; or

A health care provider from obtaining the specific reasons and the records and proceedings related to such provider’s exclusion or termination as a participating provider in a health maintenance organization, provider network, or other organization which engages in managed care if such provider has brought a civil action against such health maintenance organization, provider network, or other organization for wrongful exclusion or termination.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 739, § 4; Code 1933, § 84-7604, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1282, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 699, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1016, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 612, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 192, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 337, § 4/SB 361.

Cross references.

Privileges generally, §

24-5-501

et seq.

Privilege of state officers and employees to refuse to disclose identity of persons furnishing information pursuant to medical or public health investigation by Department of Human Resources (now the Department of Community Health for these purposes), §

50-18-72

.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 249 (2001).